Hawaii statutes.
§339‑8 Penalties. (a) Except as
otherwise provided by this chapter, any person violating any provision of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter shall be guilty of a violation,
and shall be fined not less than $100, and not more than $500 for each offense,
and ordered to pick up and remove litter from a public place under the
supervision of the director as follows:

(1) For the first offense, the violator shall spend
four hours of either picking up litter or performing community service; and

(2) For any subsequent offense, the violator shall
spend eight hours of either picking up litter or performing community service.

(b) If the environmental court judges the
violator to be incapable of litter removal and pick up, the environmental court
may provide some other community work as it deems appropriate. All persons who
are caught littering shall be required to remove the litter that they caused or
shall be liable for the costs of removing that litter. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 2, pt
of §2; am L 1979, c 60, §4; am L 1985, c 139, §1; am L 1991, c 157, §10; am L
1992, c 116, §2; am L 2006, c 158, §3; am L 2014, c 218, §8.]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next